District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.13

Disclaimer.

(a)

The issuance of bonds is in the discretion of the District. Nothing contained in this subchapter, including, but not limited to, the bonds, the financing documents, the closing documents or the Council resolution, shall be construed as obligating the District to issue any bonds for the benefit of any applicant or to participate in or assist any applicant in any way with financing, refinancing, or reimbursing the costs of the development of any project. The applicant shall have no claims for damages or for any other legal or equitable relief against the District, its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents as a consequence of any failure to issue any bonds for the benefit of any applicant.

(b)

The District reserves the right to issue its bonds in the order or priority it determines in its sole and absolute discretion. The District gives no assurance and makes no representations that any portion of any limited amount of bonds, the interest on which is excludable from gross income for federal income tax purposes, will be reserved or will be available at the time of the proposed issuance of any bonds authorized by this subchapter.

(c)

The District, by enacting this subchapter or by taking any other action in connection with financing, refinancing, or reimbursing any project, does not provide any assurance that the project is viable or sound, that the applicant is financially sound, or that amounts owing on any bonds or under any loan will be paid. Neither the applicant, any purchaser of the bonds, nor any other person shall rely upon the District with respect to these matters.

History

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 14, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-340.13.